Washington statutes.
RCW 18.310.100

Controlling person requirements.

(1)(a) An appraisal management company shall designate one controlling person that will be the main contact for all communication between the department and the appraisal management company.

(b) Should the controlling person change, the appraisal management company must notify the director within fourteen business days and provide the name and contact information of the new controlling person.

(2) The controlling person designated under subsection (1) of this section must:

(a) Have never had a license or certificate to act as an appraiser surrendered in lieu of disciplinary action, refused, denied, canceled, or revoked in any state;

(b) Be of good moral character, as determined by the department; and

(c) Submit to a background investigation under RCW 18.310.070.

[ 2010 c 179 s 9.]